Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
Article 9 Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency Nomenclature Act

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, Article 9, as enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 564, § 1/SB 33, was redesignated as Article 10.

38-3-140.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency Nomenclature Act of 2008.”

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-140

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 543, § 1/HB 1201; Ga. L. 2016, p. 91, § 12/SB 416.

38-3-141.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Badge” means any official badge, identification card, or security pass used by members of the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency, either in the past or currently.

“Director” means the director of the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency.

“Emblem” means any official patch or other emblem worn currently or formerly or used by the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency to identify the agency, a division of the agency, or employees of the agency.

“Person” means any person, corporation, organization, or political subdivision of the State of Georgia.

“Seal” means any official symbol, mark, or abbreviation which represents and is used, currently or in the past, by the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency or any other division or operation under the command of the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency to identify the agency, a division of the agency, or employees of the agency.

“Willful violator” means any person who knowingly violates the provisions of this article. Any person who violates this article after being advised in writing by the director that such person’s activity is in violation of this article shall be considered a willful violator and shall be considered in willful violation of this article. Any person whose agent or representative is a willful violator and who has knowledge of the violation by the agent or representative shall also be considered a willful violator and in willful violation of this article unless, upon learning of the violation, he or she immediately terminates the agency or other relationship with such violator.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-141

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 543, § 1/HB 1201; Ga. L. 2016, p. 91, § 13/SB 416.

38-3-142.
Use of agency name without written permission prohibited in certain circumstances.

Whoever, except with the written permission of the director, knowingly uses the words “Georgia Emergency Management Agency,” “Georgia Homeland Security Agency,” “Emergency Management Agency,” “Homeland Security Agency,” “GEMA,” “GEMHSA,” or “GEMA/HS” in referring to Georgia’s Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency in connection with any advertisement, circular, book, pamphlet, or other publication, play, motion picture, broadcast, telecast, or other production in a manner reasonably calculated to convey the impression that such advertisement, circular, book, pamphlet, or other publication, play, motion picture, broadcast, telecast, or other production is approved, endorsed, or authorized by or associated with the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency shall be in violation of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-142

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 543, § 1/HB 1201; Ga. L. 2016, p. 91, § 14/SB 416.

38-3-143.
Use or display of agency symbols without written permission prohibited.

Any person who uses or displays any symbol, including any emblem, seal, or badge, current or historical, used by the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency without written permission from the director shall be in violation of this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-143

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 543, § 1/HB 1201; Ga. L. 2016, p. 91, § 15/SB 416.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2008, Code Section 35-3-143, as enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 543, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 38-3-143.

38-3-144.
Requests for permission; grants of permission at director’s discretion.

Any person seeking permission to use or display the nomenclature or symbols of the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency may request such permission in writing to the director. The director shall serve notice on the requesting party within 15 calendar days after receipt of the request of his or her decision on whether the person may use the nomenclature or the symbol. If the director does not respond within the 15 day time period, then the request is presumed to have been denied. The grant of permission under this article shall be at the discretion of the director and under such conditions as the director may impose.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-144

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 543, § 1/HB 1201; Ga. L. 2016, p. 91, § 16/SB 416.

38-3-145.
Injunctions to restrain violations.

Whenever there shall be an actual or threatened violation of this article, the director shall have the right to apply to the Superior Court of Fulton County or to the superior court of the county of residence of the violator for an injunction to restrain the violation.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-145

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 543, § 1/HB 1201.

38-3-146.
Civil penalties for willful violators.

In addition to any other relief or sanction for a violation of this article, the director shall be entitled to collect a civil penalty in the amount of $1,000.00 for each violation from a willful violator. Further, the director shall be entitled to recover reasonable attorney’s fees for bringing any action against a willful violator.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-146

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 543, § 1/HB 1201.

38-3-147.
Private cause of action; recovery of treble damages, punitive damages, and attorney’s fees.

Any person who has given money or any other item of value to another person due in part to such person’s use of agency nomenclature or symbols in violation of this article may maintain a suit for damages against the violator. Where it is proven that the violation was willful, the victim shall be entitled to recover treble damages, punitive damages, and reasonable attorney’s fees.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-147

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 543, § 1/HB 1201.

38-3-148.
Criminal penalties for willful violators.

Any willful violator shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be subject to a fine of not more than $5,000.00 or to imprisonment for not more than 12 months, or both. Each violation shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-148

, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 543, § 1/HB 1201.